North Dakota, session 69, SB2191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - HEALTH CARE SERVICES IN LOCAL
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying health care
services in local correctional facilities. The study must include:
a. A review of current state and federal requirements of local correctional facilities regarding
health care services;
b. A review of health care services funding patterns for local correctional facilities;
c. A consideration of the challenges of local health care facilities and providers in serving
incarcerated individuals in local correctional facilities;
d. An analysis of models of best practices for health care services for incarcerated
individuals in local correctional facilities; and
e. A consideration of methods to expand local, state, and federal funding for health care
services in local correctional facilities.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2191 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2191.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 9 Absent 10
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State